Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB453.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7102 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 7102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Telecommunicator." As follows:(1) An individual employed by a public safety answering point or PSAP, as defined in section 5302 (relating to 123456789101112131415161718 definitions), whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit or dispatch emergency and nonemergency calls for emergency medical, fire and rescue, law enforcement or other public safety services via telephone, radio or other communication device.(2) The term includes a call taker, emergency dispatcher and supervisor.* * *Section 2. The definition of "emergency responder" in section 7332 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7332. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Emergency responder." An individual in the public or private sector who has special skills, qualifications, training, knowledge or experience, whether or not the person possesses a license, certificate, permit or other official recognition for the skills, qualifications, training, knowledge or experience, that would benefit a participating political subdivision in responding to an authorized mutual aid request or participating in an authorized drill or exercise. The term shall include a law enforcement officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical services worker, a telecommunicator, a physician, nurse or other public health worker, an emergency management official, a coroner or medical examiner, a State-certified hazardous materials team member, a public works worker, a building inspector, an architect, an engineer or other design professional or a person with specialized equipment operations 20250HB0453PN0435 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 skills or training or with any other skills needed to provide aid in a declared emergency.* * *Section 3. The definition of "emergency responder" in section 75A01 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 75A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Emergency responder." Any of the following:(1) A current or former certified emergency medical services provider, current or former member of an emergency medical services agency, fire company or rescue company.(2) A peace officer.(3) A [911 dispatcher] telecommunicator.(4) A coroner or medical examiner who responds in an official capacity to an emergency.(5) A corrections officer.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0453PN0435 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021